HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1952 yn nymyzdakyda .
SFX 1952 yr rymyzdakyda .
SFX 1952 ys symyzdakyda .
SFX 1952 yş şymyzdakyda .
SFX 1952 yz zymyzdakydan .
SFX 1952 yl lymyzdakydan .
SFX 1952 yn nymyzdakydan .
SFX 1952 yr rymyzdakydan .
SFX 1952 ys symyzdakydan .
SFX 1952 yş şymyzdakydan .
SFX 1952 yz zyňyzdaky .
SFX 1952 yl lyňyzdaky .
SFX 1952 yn nyňyzdaky .
SFX 1952 yr ryňyzdaky .
SFX 1952 ys syňyzdaky .
SFX 1952 yş şyňyzdaky .
SFX 1952 yz zyňyzdakynyň .
SFX 1952 yl lyňyzdakynyň .
SFX 1952 yn nyňyzdakynyň .
SFX 1952 yr ryňyzdakynyň .
SFX 1952 ys syňyzdakynyň .
SFX 1952 yş şyňyzdakynyň .
SFX 1952 yz zyňyzdaka .
SFX 1952 yl lyňyzdaka .
SFX 1952 yn nyňyzdaka .
SFX 1952 yr ryňyzdaka .
SFX 1952 ys syňyzdaka .
SFX 1952 yş şyňyzdaka .
SFX 1952 yz zyňyzdakyny .
SFX 1952 yl lyňyzdakyny .
SFX 1952 yn nyňyzdakyny .
SFX 1952 yr ryňyzdakyny .
SFX 1952 ys syňyzdakyny .
SFX 1952 yş şyňyzdakyny .
SFX 1952 yz zyňyzdakyda .
SFX 1952 yl lyňyzdakyda .
SFX 1952 yn nyňyzdakyda .
SFX 1952 yr ryňyzdakyda .
SFX 1952 ys syňyzdakyda .
SFX 1952 yş şyňyzdakyda .
SFX 1952 yz zyňyzdakydan .
SFX 1952 yl lyňyzdakydan .
SFX 1952 yn nyňyzdakydan .
SFX 1952 yr ryňyzdakydan .
SFX 1952 ys syňyzdakydan .
SFX 1952 yş şyňyzdakydan .
SFX 1952 0 laryndaky .
SFX 1952 0 laryndakynyň .
SFX 1952 0 laryndaka .
SFX 1952 0 laryndakyny .
SFX 1952 0 laryndakyda .
SFX 1952 0 laryndakydan .
SFX 1952 0 ly .
SFX 1952 0 syz .
SFX 1952 0 lar .
SFX 1952 0 laryň .
SFX 1952 0 lara .
SFX 1952 0 lary .
SFX 1952 0 larda .
SFX 1952 0 lardan .
SFX 1952 0 lardaky .
SFX 1952 0 lardakynyň .
SFX 1952 0 lardaka .
SFX 1952 0 lardakyny .
SFX 1952 0 lardakyda .
SFX 1952 0 lardakydan .
SFX 1952 0 larym .
SFX 1952 0 larymyň .
SFX 1952 0 laryma .
SFX 1952 0 larymy .
SFX 1952 0 larymda .
SFX 1952 0 larymdan .
SFX 1952 0 laryň .
SFX 1952 0 laryňyň .
SFX 1952 0 laryňa .
SFX 1952 0 laryňy .
SFX 1952 0 laryňda .
SFX 1952 0 laryňdan .
SFX 1952 0 larymyz .
SFX 1952 0 larymyzyň .
SFX 1952 0 larymyza .
SFX 1952 0 larymyzy .
SFX 1952 0 larymyzda .
SFX 1952 0 larymyzdan .
SFX 1952 0 laryňyz .
SFX 1952 0 laryňyzyň .
SFX 1952 0 laryňyza .
SFX 1952 0 laryňyzy .
SFX 1952 0 laryňyzda .
SFX 1952 0 laryňyzdan .
SFX 1952 0 daky .
SFX 1952 0 dakynyň .
SFX 1952 0 daka .
SFX 1952 0 dakyny .
SFX 1952 0 dakyda .
SFX 1952 0 dakydan .
SFX 1952 0 dakylar .
SFX 1952 0 dakylaryň .
SFX 1952 0 dakylara .
SFX 1952 0 dakylary .
SFX 1952 0 dakylarda .
SFX 1952 0 dakylardan .
SFX 1952 0 dyr .
SFX 1952 0 lardyr .
SFX 1952 0 dygym .
SFX 1952 0 dygymyň .
SFX 1952 0 dygyma .
SFX 1952 0 dygymy .
SFX 1952 0 dygymda .
SFX 1952 0 dygymdan .
SFX 1952 0 dygyň .
SFX 1952 0 dygyňyň .
SFX 1952 0 dygyňa .
SFX 1952 0 dygyňy .
SFX 1952 0 dygyňda .
SFX 1952 0 dygyňdan .
SFX 1952 0 dygy .
SFX 1952 0 dygynyň .
SFX 1952 0 dygyna .
SFX 1952 0 dygyny .
SFX 1952 0 dygynda .
SFX 1952 0 dygyndan .
SFX 1952 0 dygymyz .
SFX 1952 0 dygymyzyň .
SFX 1952 0 dygymyza .
SFX 1952 0 dygymyzy .
SFX 1952 0 dygymyzda .
SFX 1952 0 dygymyzdan .
SFX 1952 0 dygyňyz .
SFX 1952 0 dygyňyzyň .
SFX 1952 0 dygyňyza .
SFX 1952 0 dygyňyzy .
SFX 1952 0 dygyňyzda .
SFX 1952 0 dygyňyzdan .
SFX 1952 0 dyklary .
SFX 1952 0 dyklarynyň .
SFX 1952 0 dyklaryna .
SFX 1952 0 dyklaryny .
SFX 1952 0 dyklarynda .
SFX 1952 0 dyklaryndan .
SFX 1952 0 lyk .
SFX 1952 0 lygyň .
SFX 1952 0 lyga .
SFX 1952 0 lygy .
SFX 1952 0 lykda .
SFX 1952 0 lykdan .
