HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.dic
agyz/1952
akyl/1952
alyş/1952
asyl/1952
asyr/1952
bagyr/1952
bagyş/1952
baryş/1952
baýyr/1952
çagyl/1952
çaýyr/1952
çygyr/1952
çyryş/1952
gabyr/1952
gabyz/1952
galyş/1952
gamyş/1952
garyn/1952
garyş/1952
gaýyş/1952
gyňyr/1952
haýyr/1952
labyz/1952
lagyl/1952
maňyz/1952
nagyş/1952
nakyl/1952
pasyl/1952
paýyz/1952
sabyr/1952
salyş/1952
samyr/1952
sygyr/1952
şygyr/1952
tanyş/1952
wagyz/1952
ýagyn/1952
ýagyr/1952
ýagyş/1952
ýalyn/1952
zyňyş/1952
